Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.071

Renewals.

The secretary shall establish the administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for renewal of licenses as provided in this chapter and in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 11; 1991 c 3 s 49; 1989 c 202 s 2.]